Hawaii statutes.
§501-9 Assistant registrars; powers.
The registrar of conveyances in the bureau of conveyances designated in section
502-1 and the registrar of conveyances' deputy are assistant registrars to
carry out the duties of recording and registration required under this
chapter. Assistant registrars have the same authority as the registrar to make
all memoranda affecting the title of land, to enter and issue new certificates
of title as provided herein and to affix the seal of the court to the
certificates of titles. In executing this chapter, the assistant registrars
shall be subject to the general direction of the registrar in order to secure
uniformity throughout the State. In case of the death or disability of the
registrar, the assistant registrars in Honolulu shall perform the duties of the
registrar until the vacancy is filled or the disability removed. [L 1903, c 56,
§10; RL 1925, §3199; RL 1935, §5008; RL 1945, §12608; RL 1955, §342-9; HRS
§501-9; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 346, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next